Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
ARTICLE 45 FAIR CAMPAIGN PRACTICES ACT
1-45-108. Disclosure - definitions - repeal.

Subject to subsection (1.5) of this section, all candidate committees, political committees, issue committees, small donor committees, and political parties shall report to the appropriate officer their contributions received, including the name and address of each person who has contributed twenty dollars or more; expenditures made, and obligations entered into by the committee or party.
(1) (a) (I) Subject to subsection (1.5) of this section, all candidate committees, political committees, issue committees, small donor committees, and political parties shall report to the appropriate officer their contributions received, including the name and address of each person who has contributed twenty dollars or more; expenditures made, and obligations entered into by the committee or party.

Subject to subsection (1.5) of this section, in the case of contributions made to a candidate committee, political committee, issue committee, and political party, the disclosure required by this section shall also include the occupation and employer of each person who has made a contribution of one hundred dollars or more to such committee or party.

Any person who expends one thousand dollars or more per calendar year on electioneering communications or regular biennial school electioneering communications shall report to the secretary of state, in accordance with the disclosure required by this section, the amount expended on the communications and the name and address of any person that contributes more than two hundred fifty dollars per year to the person expending one thousand dollars or more on the communications. If the person making a contribution of more than two hundred fifty dollars is a natural person, the disclosure required by this section must also include the person's occupation and employer. Electioneering communication reports must include the name of the candidate or candidates unambiguously referred to in the electioneering communication or regular biennial school electioneering communication. In accordance with section

1-45-103 (9)

, an electioneering communication includes any communication that satisfies all other requirements set forth in section 2 (7) of article XXVIII of the state constitution but that is broadcast, printed, mailed, delivered, or distributed between the primary election and the general election.

In the case of a limited liability company, the disclosure required by this section shall include, in addition to any other information required to be disclosed, each contribution from the limited liability company regardless of the dollar amount of the contribution.

Any disbursement not otherwise defined as an expenditure may be reported to the appropriate officer.

Any person, after expending five thousand dollars in aggregate in a calendar year on direct ballot issue or ballot question expenditures, shall, for each additional expenditure of one thousand dollars or more, report to the secretary of state in accordance with the disclosure required by this section: The amount of the expenditure, the purpose for which the expenditure was made, the date of the expenditure, name and address of the payee, and the ballot question or ballot issue supported or opposed. Such a report must be filed with the secretary of state no later than forty-eight hours after the direct ballot issue or ballot question expenditure was made.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2158, § 3, effective June 3, 2003.)

A candidate committee in a special district election is not required to file reports under this section until the committee has received contributions or made expenditures exceeding two hundred dollars in the aggregate during the election cycle.

For purposes of this section, a political party shall be treated as a separate entity at the state, county, district, and local levels.

A candidate's candidate committee may reimburse the candidate for expenditures the candidate has made on behalf of the candidate committee. Any such expenditures may be reimbursed at any time. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any expenditure reimbursed to the candidate by the candidate's candidate committee within the election cycle during which the expenditure is made shall be treated only as an expenditure and not as a contribution to and an expenditure by the candidate's candidate committee. Notwithstanding the date on which any such expenditure is reimbursed, the expenditure shall be reported at the time it is made in accordance with the requirements of this section.

(1.5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in light of the opinion of the United States court of appeals for the tenth circuit in the case of Coalition for Secular Government v. Williams, no. 14-1469 (10th circuit March 2, 2016), that affirmed the order of the federal district court in the case of Coalition for Secular Gov't v. Gessler, case no. 12 CV 1708, the disclosure requirements specified in subsection (1)(a)(I) or (1)(a)(II) of this section and the reporting requirements specified in subsection (3.3) or (6) of this section shall not apply to a small-scale issue committee. A small-scale issue committee shall disclose or file reports about the contributions or expenditures it has made or received or otherwise register as an issue committee in connection with accepting or making such contributions or expenditures in accordance with the following alternative requirements:

A small-scale issue committee that accepts or makes contributions or expenditures in an aggregate amount during any applicable election cycle that does not exceed two hundred dollars is not required to disclose or file reports about the contributions or expenditures it has made or received or otherwise register as an issue committee in connection with accepting or making such contributions or expenditures.

A small-scale issue committee that accepts or makes contributions or expenditures in an aggregate amount during any applicable election cycle of between two hundred dollars and five thousand dollars shall register with the appropriate officer within ten business days of the date on which the aggregate amount of contributions or expenditures exceeds two hundred dollars. The registration required by this subsection (1.5)(b)(I) must include a statement listing:

The committee's full name, spelling out any acronyms used in the name;

The name of a natural person authorized to act as a registered agent of the committee;

A street address for the principal place of business of the committee;

The purpose or nature of interest of the committee; and

The name of the financial institution in which, in a separate account bearing the name of the committee, all contributions received by the committee are deposited.

A small-scale issue committee described in subsection (1.5)(b)(I) of this section is not required to make any disclosure about any contributions or expenditures it has made or received.

At such time as an issue committee that began as a small-scale issue committee accepts or makes contributions or expenditures in an aggregate amount during any applicable election cycle that exceeds five thousand dollars, the committee shall report to the appropriate officer, for each particular contribution or expenditure accepted or made, the name and address of each person who has made such contribution and the amount of each specific contribution and expenditure accepted or made by the committee.

At such time as any issue committee that began as a small-scale issue committee accepts or makes contributions or expenditures in an aggregate amount during any applicable election cycle that exceeds five thousand dollars, the committee shall make disclosure of any contributions or expenditures it accepts or makes on or after the date on which such aggregate amount exceeds five thousand dollars in compliance with all applicable requirements under this article 45 pertaining to the disclosure by an issue committee of its contributions or expenditures accepted or made.

Within fifteen days of a small-scale issue committee becoming subject to the applicable requirements governing an issue committee under this article 45, the committee through its registered agent shall report this change in the committee's status to the secretary of state.

Except as provided in subsections (2)(a)(V), (2.1), (2.5), (2.7), and (6) of this section, such reports that are required to be filed with the secretary of state must be filed:
(2) (a) (I) Except as provided in subsections (2)(a)(V), (2.1), (2.5), (2.7), and (6) of this section, such reports that are required to be filed with the secretary of state must be filed:

Quarterly in off-election years no later than the fifteenth calendar day following the end of the applicable quarter;

On the first Monday in May and on each Monday every two weeks thereafter before the primary election;

On the first day of each month beginning the sixth full month before the major election; except that no monthly report shall be required on the first day of the month in which the major election is held;

On the first Monday in September and on each Monday every two weeks thereafter before the major election;

Thirty-five days after the major election in election years; and

Fourteen days before and thirty days after a special legislative election held in an off-election year.

Such reports that are required to be filed with the municipal clerk and such reports required to be filed pursuant to section 1-45-109 (1)(a)(II) and (1)(c) must be filed on the twenty-first day and on the Friday before and thirty-five days after the primary election, where applicable, and the major election in election years and annually in off-election years on the first day of the month in which the anniversary of the major election occurs.

For purposes of this section, "election year" means every even-numbered year for political parties and political committees and each year in which the particular candidate committee's candidate, or issue committee's issue, appears on the ballot, including a regular biennial school election; and "major election" means the election that decides an issue committee's issue, the election that elects a person to the public office sought by the candidate committee's candidate, and a regular biennial school election.

If the reporting day falls on a weekend or legal holiday, the report shall be filed by the close of the next business day.

Any political committee, small donor committee, independent expenditure committee, or political organization that is participating in a regular biennial school election shall file its disclosure reports in accordance with the filing schedule specified in sub-subparagraphs (C) to (E) of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a) as of the date the committee or organization, as applicable, makes an expenditure or undertakes spending in connection with that election.

The reports required by this section shall also include the balance of funds at the beginning of the reporting period, the total of contributions received, the total of expenditures made during the reporting period, and the name and address of the financial institution used by the committee or party.

All reports filed with the secretary of state pursuant to this subsection (2) shall be for the reporting periods established pursuant to rules promulgated by the secretary of state in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

A candidate committee for a former officeholder or a person not elected to office that has no change in the balance of funds maintained by such committee, receives no contributions, makes no expenditures, and enters into no obligations during a reporting period shall not be required to file a report under this section for such period.

The reporting period for all reports required to be filed with the municipal clerk and such reports required to be filed pursuant to section 1-45-109 (1)(a)(II) and (1)(c) shall close five calendar days prior to the effective date of filing.

(2.1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2.2) of this section, in the case of a regular biennial school election or a special school election, a candidate committee for school district director shall file reports that are required to be filed with the secretary of state according to the filing schedule specified in subsections (2)(a)(I)(A), (2)(a)(I)(C), (2)(a)(I)(D), and (2)(a)(I)(E) of this section.

(2.2) In connection with a recall election of a school district director, reports of contributions and expenditures must be filed in accordance with the deadlines that are specified in subsection (6) of this section.

(2.3) Repealed.

(2.5) (a) Except as provided in subsection (2.5)(b) of this section, and in addition to any report required to be filed with the secretary of state or municipal clerk under this section, all candidate committees, issue committees, and political parties must file a report with the secretary of state of any contribution of one thousand dollars or more at any time within thirty days preceding the date of the primary election, general election, regular biennial school election, or special school election, as applicable. This report must be filed with the secretary of state no later than twenty-four hours after the receipt of said contribution.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2.5)(a) of this section, the following committees need not file the reports described in subsection (2.5)(a) of this section in the following instances:

An issue committee need not report a contribution of one thousand dollars or more preceding a primary election;

A committee for a candidate not on the ballot need not report a contribution of one thousand dollars or more during the off-election year;

A candidate or candidate committee for school board need not report a contribution of one thousand dollars or more during the off-election year; and

A political party during the off-election year.

(2.7) Any candidate or candidate committee supporting any candidate, including an incumbent, in a recall election, shall file reports of contributions and expenditures with the appropriate officer fourteen and seven days before the recall election and thirty days after the recall election.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3.5) of this section, all candidate committees, political committees, small donor committees, and political parties shall register with the appropriate officer before accepting or making any contributions. Registration shall include a statement listing:

The organization's full name, spelling out any acronyms used therein;

A natural person authorized to act as a registered agent;

A street address and telephone number for the principal place of operations;

All affiliated candidates and committees;

The purpose or nature of interest of the committee or party.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2010, (SB 10-041), ch. 151, p. 522, § 2, effective July 1, 2010.)

(3.3) Subject to subsections (1.5) and (7) of this section, each issue committee shall register with the appropriate officer within ten calendar days of accepting or making contributions or expenditures in excess of two hundred dollars to support or oppose any ballot issue or ballot question or upon receipt of the notice from the secretary of state pursuant to section 1-40-113 (1)(b). If required to register under the requirements of this subsection (3.3), the registration of the issue committee must include a statement containing the items listed in paragraphs (a) to (e) of subsection (3) of this section in connection with other committees and a political party.

(3.5) Any political committee that has registered with the federal election commission may file with the appropriate officer a copy of the registration filed with the federal election commission and, insofar as such registration contains substantially the same information required by subsection (3) of this section, the political committee shall be considered to have registered with the appropriate officer for purposes of subsection (3) of this section and, therefore, shall be authorized to accept or make contributions as permitted by law. Any political committee that satisfies the requirements of this subsection (3.5) shall be subject to all other legal requirements pertaining to contributions and disclosure that are applicable to political committees.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2010, (SB 10-041), ch. 151, p. 522, § 2, effective July 1, 2010.)

The registration and reporting requirements of this section shall not apply to that part of the organizational structure of a political party which is responsible for only the day-to-day operations of such political party at the national level if copies of the reports required to be filed with the Federal Election Commission pursuant to the "Federal Election Commission Act of 1971", as amended, are filed with the secretary of state and include the information required by this section.

Subject to subsection (1.5) of this section, any issue committee whose purpose is the recall of any elected official shall register with the appropriate officer within ten calendar days of accepting or making contributions or expenditures in excess of two hundred dollars to support or oppose the recall. Reports of contributions and expenditures shall be filed with the appropriate officer within fifteen days of the filing of the committee registration and every thirty days thereafter until the date of the recall election has been established and then fourteen days and seven days before the recall election and thirty days following the recall election.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and subject to subsection (7)(b) of this section, a matter is considered a ballot issue or a ballot question for the purpose of determining whether an issue committee has been formally established, thereby necessitating compliance with any disclosure and reporting requirements of this article 45 and article XXVIII of the state constitution, at the earliest of the following:

A title for the matter has been designated and fixed in accordance with law and any motion for rehearing has been heard;

The matter has been referred to the voters by the general assembly or the governing body of any political subdivision of the state with authorization to refer matters to the voters;

In the case of a citizen referendum petition, the matter has been submitted for format approval in accordance with law;

A petition concerning the matter has been circulated and signed by at least one person; except that, where a matter becomes a ballot issue or ballot question upon such signing, any person opposing the matter shall not be considered to be an issue committee for purposes of this article and article XXVIII of the state constitution until one such person knows or has reason to know of the circulation; or

A signed petition has been submitted to the appropriate officer in accordance with law.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (7), where a matter concerns a municipal annexation brought pursuant to article 12 of title 31, C.R.S., the matter shall not be considered to be a ballot issue or ballot question for the purpose of determining whether an issue committee has been formally established, thereby necessitating compliance with any disclosure and reporting requirements of this article and article XXVIII of the state constitution, unless and until the first notice of the annexation election has been published in accordance with the requirements of section 31-12-112 (6), C.R.S.

Any expenditure or spending on a covered communication that is controlled by or coordinated with a candidate or candidate's agent or a political party is considered both a contribution by the maker of the expenditure or spending, and an expenditure by the candidate committee.

For purposes of this subsection (8), "covered communication" includes:

A communication that expressly advocates for the election or defeat of a candidate;

An electioneering communication as defined in section 2 (7) of article XXVIII of the state constitution and section 1-45-103 (9), or regular biennial electioneering communication as defined in section 1-45-103 (15.5); and

A communication by a political organization that influences or attempts to influence the selection, nomination, election, or appointment of a candidate to public office.

Source:

Initiated 96:

Entire article R&RE, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, January 15, 1997.

L. 98:

(1), (2)(a), and IP(3) amended, p. 223, § 2, effective April 10; (2)(c) added, p. 951, § 3, effective May 27.

L. 99:

(2)(a) amended and (2)(c)(V) and (2)(c)(VI) added, p. 1391, §§ 14, 15, effective June 4.

L. 2000:

(2)(a) and (2)(c) amended and (2)(d), (2.3), and (2.5) added, pp. 124, 125, §§ 5, 6, effective March 15; (1) amended, p. 1725, § 2, effective June 1; (2)(e) added, p. 791, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2001:

(3)(f) added, p. 808, § 1, effective August 8; (2.3) amended, p. 1111, § 2, effective September 1.

L. 2002:

IP(2)(a)(I) and (6) amended and (2.7) added, p. 198, § 2, effective April 3; (1)(c) added, p. 1640, § 33, effective June 7.

L. 2003:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (2.3)(a), (2.5), IP(3), and (3)(f) amended and (1)(d) added, p. 2158, § 3, effective June 3.

L. 2004:

(1)(e) and (3.5) added and IP(3) amended, p. 864, §§ 2, 3, effective May 21.

L. 2007:

IP(2)(a)(I) amended, p. 2017, § 2, effective June 1; IP(2)(a)(I) and (2)(a)(I)(B) amended, p. 1299, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(a)(IV) added, p. 441, § 2, effective April 14.

L. 2009:

(2)(a)(II), (2)(e), and (2.5) amended, (HB 09-1357), ch. 361, p. 1871, § 1, effective July 1; IP(3) and (3)(f) amended and (3.3) and (7) added, (HB 09-1153), ch. 174, p. 774, § 2, effective September 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(a)(III), (3)(f), (3.3), (4), and (6) amended, (SB 10-041), ch. 151, p. 522, § 2, effective July 1; (3.3) amended, (HB 10-1370), ch. 270, p. 1241, § 5, effective January 1, 2011.

L. 2012:

(2)(a)(I)(B) amended, (SB 12-014), ch. 1, p. 1, § 1, effective January 30; (1)(c) amended, (HB 12-1269), ch. 83, p. 274, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2016:

(1)(a)(I), (1)(a)(II), (3.3), and (6) amended and (1.5) added, (SB 16-186), ch. 269, p. 1114, § 2, effective June 10; (1)(a)(III), IP(2)(a)(I), (2)(a)(III), and (2.5) amended and (2)(a)(V) added, (HB 16-1282), ch. 267, p. 1106, § 3; effective August 10.

L. 2018:

(1)(a)(III), (2.5), IP(7)(a), and (7)(a)(I) amended and (1)(a)(V) added, (HB 18-1047), ch. 155, p. 1093, § 4, effective April 23.

L. 2019:

(1)(a)(III) amended, (SB 19-068), ch. 69, p. 250, § 2, effective August 2; (1.5) R&RE and (8) added, (HB 19-1318), ch. 328, p. 3044, § 4, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

IP(2)(a)(I) and (2.5)(a) amended and (2.1) and (2.2) added, (HB 22-1060), ch. 99, p. 473, § 3, effective July 1; IP(2)(a)(I), (2)(a)(I)(E), (2)(a)(II), (2.5)(b)(II), and (2.5)(b)(III) amended and (2.5)(b)(IV) added, (HB 22-1156), ch. 108, p. 495, § 1, effective August 10; (1)(a)(VI) added, (SB 22-237), ch. 400, p. 2852, § 2, effective September 1.

1-45-108.3. Disclaimer statement - committees - electioneering communications - direct ballot issue or ballot question expenditures.

A candidate committee, political committee, issue committee, small donor committee, political organization, political party, or other person making an expenditure in excess of or spending more than one thousand dollars per calendar year on a communication that must be disclosed under article XXVIII of the state constitution or under this article 45 or supports or opposes a ballot issue or ballot question, and that is broadcast, printed, mailed, delivered; placed on a website, streaming media service, or online forum for a fee; or that is otherwise distributed shall include in the communication a disclaimer statement in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.

The disclaimer statement required by subsection (1) of this section must conform to the requirements specified in section 1-45-107.5 (5) for content, size, duration, and placement.

In addition to any other applicable requirements provided by law, any person who expends one thousand dollars or more per calendar year on electioneering communications or regular biennial school electioneering communications shall, in accordance with the requirements specified in section 1-45-107.5 (5), state in the communication the name of the person making the communication. For purposes of this subsection (3), an "electioneering communication" also includes any communication that satisfies all other requirements set forth in section 2 (7) of article XXVIII of the state constitution but that is broadcast, printed, mailed, delivered, or distributed between the primary election and the general election.

Any person who makes a direct ballot issue or ballot question expenditure shall, pursuant to section 1-45-107.5 (5), state their name in any communication that is broadcast, printed, mailed, or delivered; placed on a website, streaming media service, or online forum for a fee; or that is otherwise distributed to persons who are eligible to vote on the ballot issue or ballot question and is produced or funded, either in whole or in part, by the person who made the direct ballot issue or ballot question expenditure.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1370), ch. 270, p. 1242, § 6, effective January 1, 2011.

L. 2019:

(3) added, (SB 19-068), ch. 69, p. 251, § 3, effective August 2; entire section amended, (HB 19-1318), ch. 328, p. 3046, § 5, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

(4) added, (SB 22-237), ch. 400, p. 2853, § 3, effective June 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2010 act adding this section, see section 1 of chapter 270, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

1-45-108.5. Political organizations - disclosure.

Any political organization shall report to the appropriate officer in accordance with the requirements of sections 1-45-108 and 1-45-109:

Any contributions it receives, including the name and address of each person who has contributed twenty dollars or more to the political organization in the reporting period, and the occupation and employer of each natural person who has made a contribution of one hundred dollars or more to the political organization; and

Any spending by the political organization that exceeds twenty dollars in any one reporting period.

No political organization shall accept a contribution, or undertake spending, in currency or coin exceeding one hundred dollars.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to:

Require any political organization to make any additional disclosure pursuant to this section to the extent the political organization is already providing disclosure as a committee or political party in a manner that satisfies the requirements of sections 1-45-108 and 1-45-109; or

Authorize the secretary of state to require disclosure of the name of any natural person that is a member of an entity unless the natural person has made a contribution to a political organization in the amount of twenty dollars or more in a reporting period.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1225, § 3, effective July 1.

1-45-109. Filing - where to file - timeliness.

For the purpose of meeting the filing and reporting requirements of this article 45:

The following shall file with the secretary of state:

Candidates for statewide office, the general assembly, district attorney, district court judge, school district director, or any office representing more than one county; the candidate committees for such candidates; political committees in support of or in opposition to such candidates; issue committees in support of or in opposition to an issue on the ballot in more than one county; small donor committees making contributions to such candidates; and persons expending one thousand dollars or more per calendar year on electioneering communications.

Candidates in special district and school district director elections; the candidate committees of such candidates; political committees in support of or in opposition to such candidates; issue committees supporting or opposing a special district ballot issue; and small donor committees making contributions to such candidates.

Candidates in municipal elections, their candidate committees, any political committee in support of or in opposition to such candidate, an issue committee supporting or opposing a municipal ballot issue, and small donor committees making contributions to such candidates shall file with the municipal clerk.

All other candidates, candidate committees, issue committees, political committees, and small donor committees shall file with the secretary of state.

Reports required to be filed by this article 45 are timely if received by the appropriate officer not later than the close of business on the due date.

A person upon whom a penalty has been imposed for failure to file a statement or other information required to be filed pursuant to section 5, 6, or 7 of article XXVIII of the state constitution or section 1-45-108, this section, or section 1-45-110 by the due date may appeal the penalty by filing a written appeal with the appropriate officer no later than thirty days after the date on which notification of the imposition of the penalty was mailed to the person's last-known address. Upon receipt of an appeal pursuant to this paragraph (b), the appropriate officer shall set aside or reduce the penalty upon a showing of good cause.

In addition to any other reporting requirements of this article, every incumbent in public office and every candidate elected to public office is subject to the reporting requirements of section 24-6-203, C.R.S.

All reports required to be filed by this article 45 are public records and are open to inspection by the public during regular business hours. A copy of the report must be kept by the appropriate officer and a copy shall be made available immediately in a file for public inspection. When the secretary of state is the appropriate officer, the secretary shall make reports viewable on the secretary of state's official website.

Repealed.

The secretary of state shall operate and maintain a website so as to allow any person who wishes to review reports filed with the secretary of state's office pursuant to this article electronic read-only access to such reports free of charge.

All reports required to be filed by this article that are electronically filed pursuant to subsection (6) of this section shall be made available immediately on the website.

The website shall enable a user to produce summary reports based on search criteria that shall include, but not be limited to the reporting period, date, name of the person making a contribution or expenditure, candidate, and committee.

At the earliest practicable date, the secretary of state shall develop and implement improvements to the website's design and structure to improve the public's ability to navigate, search, browse, download, and analyze information. Such improvements shall include but need not be limited to:

Enhanced searching and summary reporting, including additional search fields such as zip code, employer, and vendor, the ability to search across multiple committees and all filers, the ability to filter or limit searches, such as by election cycle or candidate, the inclusion of smart-search features such as "name sounds like" or "name contains", and numerical totaling of amounts shown on search results;

Features that facilitate the ability to download raw data and search results in one or more common formats to enable offline sorting and analyzing;

Detailed, technical instructions for users;

Information to help users determine the scope of candidates' and committees' reports and campaign data available online, including explanations of which types of reports are available, the period covered by the online data, and which specific reports can be viewed for each campaign committee; and

Resources that give the public comparative context when viewing campaign finance data, such as compilations of the total amounts of money raised and spent by individual candidates, lists of total amounts raised and spent by all statewide and legislative candidates, and compilations of fundraising and spending across candidates and election cycles.

The secretary of state may promulgate rules necessary for the implementation of this subsection (5). Such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

The secretary of state shall establish, operate, and maintain a system that enables electronic filing using the internet of the reports required by this article to be filed with the secretary of state's office. In accordance with the provisions of section 24-21-111 (1), C.R.S., the secretary may require any filing under this section to be made by electronic means as determined by the secretary. The rules for use of the electronic filing system shall be promulgated by the secretary in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

Any person required to file with the secretary of state's office shall use the electronic filing system described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (6) in order to meet the filing requirements of this article, if so required by the secretary in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection (6), except insofar as an alternate method of filing may be permitted by the secretary. Where a person uses such electronic filing system to meet the filing requirements of this article, the secretary of state shall acknowledge by electronic means the receipt of such filing.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 1296, § 1, effective July 1, 2007.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 1296, § 1, effective July 1, 2007.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 1296, § 1, effective July 1, 2007.)

and (III) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (HB 09-1357), ch. 361, p. 1872, § 2, effective July 1, 2009.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 1296, § 1, effective July 1, 2007.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (HB 09-1357), ch. 361, p. 1872, § 2, effective July 1, 2009.)

Subsection (1) of this section shall not be construed to require the secretary of state to review reports electronically filed by persons beyond the duties specified in section 9 of article XXVIII of the state constitution.

to (12) Repealed.

Source:

Initiated 96:

Entire article R&RE, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, January 15, 1997.

L. 2000:

(4), (5), and (6) amended, p. 125, § 7, effective March 15.

L. 2001:

(1) amended and (7), (8), and (9) added, p. 808, § 2, effective August 8; (6)(b) amended, p. 1111, § 3, effective September 1.

L. 2002:

(1) and (4)(a) amended, p. 1640, § 34, effective June 7.

L. 2003:

(1) and (7)(b) amended, p. 2159, § 4, effective June 3.

L. 2005:

(9) amended, p. 760, § 7, effective June 1.

L. 2007:

(5), (6), (7), (8), and (9) amended, p. 1296, § 1, effective July 1; (2) amended, p. 1983, § 37, effective August 3.

L. 2009:

(1), (5)(a), (6), (8)(b)(II), (8)(b)(III), (8)(c)(II), and (9) amended and (10) added, (HB 09-1357), ch. 361, p. 1872, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(11) added, (SB 10-203), ch. 269, p. 1235, § 5, effective May 25; (4)(b) and (6) amended, (SB 10-041), ch. 151, p. 523, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(4)(b) amended and (4)(c) and (12) added, (HB 17-1155), ch. 236, p. 966, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

IP(1), (1)(a)(I), (2)(a), (4)(a), (4)(b), and (4)(c)(I) amended, (HB 18-1047), ch. 155, p. 1094, § 5, effective April 23.

L. 2019:

(4)(b), (4)(c), (11), and (12) repealed, (SB 19-232), ch. 330, p. 3065, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

(1)(a)(II) amended, (HB 22-1060), ch. 99, p. 474, § 4, effective July 1.

1-45-110. Candidate affidavit - disclosure statement.

When any individual becomes a candidate, such individual shall certify, by affidavit filed with the appropriate officer within ten days, that the candidate is familiar with the provisions of this article; except that an individual who is a candidate in a special legislative election that filed a candidate affidavit for the preceding general election shall not be required to comply with the provisions of this section, and except that a candidate in a special district election shall file the candidate affidavit or, alternatively, a copy of the candidate's self-nomination and acceptance form or letter submitted in accordance with section 1-13.5-303, if such form or letter contains a statement that the candidate is familiar with the provisions of this article, no later than the date established for certification of the special district's ballot pursuant to section 1-5-203 (3)(a). A candidate in a municipal election may comply with this section by filing a candidate affidavit pursuant to section 31-10-302 (6), C.R.S., if such affidavit contains a statement that the candidate is familiar with the provisions of this article.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, each candidate for the general assembly, governor, lieutenant governor, attorney general, state treasurer, secretary of state, state board of education, regent of the University of Colorado, and district attorney shall file a statement disclosing the information required by section 24-6-202 (2) with the appropriate officer, on a form approved by the secretary of state, within ten days of filing the affidavit required by subsection (1) of this section.

No candidate listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be required to file another disclosure statement if the candidate had already filed such a statement less than ninety days prior to filing the affidavit required by subsection (1) of this section.

(2.5) A candidate seeking reelection does not have to file another disclosure statement required by subsection (2)(a) of this section if the incumbent has filed the annual report required by section 24-6-202 (2).

If any person fails to file the affidavit or the disclosure statement required by subsection (2) of this section, the designated election official certifying the ballot in accordance with section 1-5-203 (3)(a) shall send a notice to the person by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the person's mailing address. The notice must state that the person will be disqualified as a candidate if the person fails to file the appropriate document within five business days of the receipt of the notice. If the person fails to file the appropriate document within that time frame, the designated election official shall disqualify the candidate.

Any disclosure statement required by subsection (2) of this section shall be amended no more than thirty days after any termination or acquisition of interests as to which disclosure is required.

If a person is defeated as a candidate or withdraws from the candidacy, that person shall not be required to comply with the provisions of this section after the withdrawal or defeat.

Source:

Initiated 96:

Entire article R&RE, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, January 15, 1997.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 1392, § 16, effective June 4.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1641, § 35, effective June 7.

L. 2010:

(3) amended, (SB 10-041), ch. 151, p. 524, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 74, § 44, effective February 18.

L. 2018:

(3) amended, (HB 18-1047), ch. 155, p. 1095, § 6, effective April 23.

L. 2022:

(2.5) added, (HB 22-1156), ch. 108, p. 496, § 2, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-45-105 as it existed prior to 1996.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.